Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Doula” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(b) “Lactation counselor” and “lactation educator” have the  meanings given those terms
in ORS 676.665.
(c) “Community-based services during  the perinatal period” includes, but is not limited
to, services provided by a doula, lactation counselor or  lactation educator to a pregnant or
postpartum individual from conception through one year postpartum.
(2)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish a community-based perinatal services
access program to support activities that increase access  to culturally specific and culturally
competent community-based services during the perinatal period. The program  must issue
grants to eligible entities with a demonstrated ability to offer  the activities described in this
subsection, including culturally specific organizations, the nine  federally recognized tribes in
this state, nonprofit organizations and businesses.
(b) Grants issued under this section may be used for purposes including,  but not limited
to:
(A) Paying for costs of required training and education to provide community-based ser-
vices during the perinatal period, including tuition, fees,  books and other materials and
supplies;
(B) Providing wages and financial benefits for individuals  who are training to provide
community-based services during the perinatal period;
(C) Outreach and recruitment to attract individuals to  training programs to provide
community-based services during the perinatal period;
(D) Funding for culturally specific organizations and programs to:
(i) Establish or expand community-based services during the perinatal period;
(ii) Support billing insurance for community-based services during the perinatal period;
(iii) Provide training and mentoring for providers of community-based services during the
perinatal period; and
(iv) Conduct consumer or  provider education and research regarding community-based
services during the perinatal period; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 692 (SB 692-B) Page 1
(E) Funding to  provide technical assistance related to billing and consumer or provider
outreach and education to:
(i) Doulas; and
(ii) Organizations that employ doulas or contract with doulas to provide doula services.
(3) An eligible entity that receives a grant  issued under this section may use the grant
to provide funding to partner entities that are organized  to meet the purposes of the pro-
gram.
(4) The  authority may administer the program directly or contract with a third party to
administer the program. If the authority contracts with a  third party, the third party must
have experience in implementing state-funded grant programs that  utilize community and
stakeholder engagement.
(5) The authority may receive gifts, grants or contributions from any source, whether
public or  private, to carry out the provisions of this section. Moneys received under this
section shall be  deposited in the Community-Based Perinatal Services Access Fund estab-
lished under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2.
The Community-Based Perinatal Services Access Fund  is established in the
State Treasury, separate and  distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the
Community-Based Perinatal Services Access Fund shall be credited to  the fund. The fund
consists of moneys  appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly and gifts, grants
or other moneys contributed to the fund by any  source, whether public or private. Moneys
in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Oregon Health Authority to carry out sec-
tion 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.  ORS 414.025, as amended by section 5, chapter 18, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
414.025. As used in this chapter and ORS chapters 411 and  413, unless the context or a specially
applicable statutory definition requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Alternative payment methodology” means  a payment other than a fee-for-services pay-
ment, used by coordinated care organizations as compensation for the provision of integrated and
coordinated health care and services.
(b) “Alternative payment methodology” includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Shared savings arrangements;
(B) Bundled payments; and
(C) Payments based on episodes.
(2) “Behavioral health assessment” means an  evaluation by a behavioral health clinician, in
person or using telemedicine, to determine a patient’s need for immediate crisis stabilization.
(3) “Behavioral health clinician” means:
(a) A licensed psychiatrist;
(b) A licensed psychologist;
(c) A licensed nurse practitioner with a specialty in psychiatric mental health;
(d) A licensed clinical social worker;
(e) A licensed professional counselor or licensed marriage and family therapist;
(f) A certified clinical social work associate;
(g) An intern or resident who is  working under a board-approved supervisory contract in a
clinical mental health field; or
(h) Any other clinician  whose authorized scope of practice includes mental health diagnosis and
treatment.
(4) “Behavioral health crisis” means a disruption in an  individual’s mental or emotional stability
or functioning resulting in an urgent need for immediate outpatient  treatment in an emergency de-
partment or admission to a hospital to prevent a serious deterioration in the individual’s mental  or
physical  health.
(5) “Behavioral health home” means a mental health disorder or substance  use disorder treat-
ment organization, as defined by the Oregon  Health Authority by rule, that provides integrated
Enrolled Senate Bill 692 (SB 692-B) Page 2
health care to individuals whose primary diagnoses are mental health disorders  or substance use
disorders.
(6) “Category  of aid” means assistance provided by the Oregon Supplemental Income Program,
aid granted under ORS 411.877 to  411.896 and 412.001 to 412.069 or federal Supplemental Security
Income payments.
(7) “Community health  worker” means an individual who meets qualification criteria adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who:
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in an urban or rural community, either for pay or as a volunteer in  association with
a local health care system;
(c) To the extent practicable, shares ethnicity, language, socioeconomic status and  life experi-
ences with the residents of the community the worker serves;
(d) Assists members of the community to improve their  health and increases the capacity of the
community to meet the health care needs of its residents and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides health education and information that is culturally appropriate to the individuals
being served;
(f) Assists community residents in receiving the care they need;
(g) May give peer counseling and guidance on health behaviors; and
(h) May provide direct services such as first aid or blood pressure screening.
(8) “Coordinated care organization” means an organization meeting criteria adopted by  the
Oregon Health Authority under ORS 414.572.
(9) “Doula” means a trained professional who  provides continuous physical, emotional
and informational support to an individual during pregnancy, labor  and delivery or the
postpartum period to help the individual achieve the healthiest and most  satisfying experi-
ence possible.
[(9)] (10) “Dually eligible for Medicare and Medicaid” means, with respect to  eligibility for en-
rollment in a coordinated care organization, that an individual  is eligible for health services funded
by Title XIX of the Social Security Act and is:
(a) Eligible for or enrolled in Part A of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act; or
(b) Enrolled in Part B of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act.
[(10)(a)] (11)(a) “Family  support specialist” means an individual who meets qualification criteria
adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who provides supportive services to and  has ex-
perience parenting a child who:
(A) Is a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment; or
(B) Is facing or has faced difficulties in accessing education, health  and wellness services due
to a mental health or behavioral health barrier.
(b) A “family support specialist” may be a peer wellness specialist or a peer support specialist.
[(11)] (12) “Global budget” means  a total amount established prospectively by the Oregon Health
Authority to be paid to a  coordinated care organization for the delivery of, management of, access
to and quality of the health care delivered to members of the coordinated care organization.
[(12)] (13) “Health insurance exchange” or  “exchange” means an American Health Benefit Ex-
change described in 42 U.S.C. 18031, 18032, 18033 and 18041.
[(13)] (14) “Health services” means at least so much of each of the following as are  funded by
the Legislative Assembly based upon the  prioritized list of health services compiled by the Health
Evidence Review Commission under ORS 414.690:
(a) Services required by federal law to be included in the state’s medical assistance program in
order for the program to qualify for federal funds;
(b) Services provided  by a physician as defined in ORS 677.010, a nurse practitioner licensed
under ORS 678.375, a behavioral health clinician or other licensed  practitioner within the scope of
the practitioner’s practice as defined by state law, and ambulance services;
(c) Prescription drugs;
(d) Laboratory and X-ray services;
Enrolled Senate Bill 692 (SB 692-B) Page 3
(e) Medical equipment and supplies;
(f) Mental health services;
(g) Chemical dependency services;
(h) Emergency dental services;
(i) Nonemergency dental services;
(j) Provider services, other than services described in paragraphs (a) to (i), (k), (L) and  (m) of
this subsection, defined by federal  law that may be included in the state’s medical assistance pro-
gram;
(k) Emergency hospital services;
(L) Outpatient hospital services; and
(m) Inpatient hospital services.
[(14)] (15) “Income” has the meaning given that term in ORS 411.704.
[(15)(a)] (16)(a) “Integrated health care” means care provided to  individuals and their families
in a patient centered primary care  home or behavioral health home by licensed primary care
clinicians, behavioral health clinicians and other care  team members, working together to address
one or more of the following:
(A) Mental illness.
(B) Substance use disorders.
(C) Health behaviors that contribute to chronic illness.
(D) Life stressors and crises.
(E) Developmental risks and conditions.
(F) Stress-related physical symptoms.
(G) Preventive care.
(H) Ineffective patterns of health care utilization.
(b) As used in this subsection, “other care team members” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Qualified mental health professionals or qualified mental  health associates meeting require-
ments adopted by the Oregon Health Authority by rule;
(B) Peer wellness specialists;
(C) Peer support specialists;
(D) Community health workers who have completed a state-certified training program;
(E) Personal health navigators; or
(F) Other qualified individuals approved by the Oregon Health Authority.
[(16)] (17) “Investments and savings” means cash, securities  as defined in ORS 59.015, negotiable
instruments as defined in ORS 73.0104 and such similar investments or savings as  the department
or the authority may establish by rule that are available to the  applicant or recipient to contribute
toward meeting the needs of the applicant or recipient.
[(17)] (18) “Medical assistance” means so  much of the medical, mental health, preventive, sup-
portive, palliative and remedial care and services as may be prescribed  by the authority according
to the standards established pursuant to ORS 414.065, including premium assistance under ORS
414.115 and  414.117, payments made for services provided under an insurance or other contractual
arrangement and money paid directly to the recipient for the purchase of health  services and for
services described in ORS 414.710.
[(18)] (19) “Medical assistance” includes any care or services for  any individual who is a patient
in a medical institution or any care or services for any individual  who has attained 65 years of age
or is under 22 years of age,  and who is a patient in a private or public institution for mental dis-
eases. Except  as  provided in ORS 411.439 and 411.447, “medical assistance” does not include care
or services for a resident of a nonmedical public institution.
[(19)] (20) “Patient centered primary  care home” means a health care team or clinic that is or-
ganized in  accordance with the standards established by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS
414.655 and that incorporates the following core attributes:
(a) Access to care;
(b) Accountability to consumers and to the community;
Enrolled Senate Bill 692 (SB 692-B) Page 4
(c) Comprehensive whole person care;
(d) Continuity of care;
(e) Coordination and integration of care; and
(f) Person and family centered care.
[(20)] (21) “Peer support specialist” means any of the following individuals who meet  qualifica-
tion criteria adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who  provide supportive services to a
current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment:
(a) An individual who is a current or former consumer of mental health treatment; or
(b) An individual who is in recovery, as defined by the Oregon Health Authority by rule,  from
an addiction disorder.
[(21)] (22) “Peer wellness specialist” means an individual who meets  qualification criteria
adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665  and who is responsible for assessing mental health and
substance use disorder service and support needs of a member of a coordinated care  organization
through community outreach,  assisting members with access to available services and resources,
addressing barriers to services and providing education and information  about available resources
for individuals with mental health or substance use disorders in order  to reduce stigma and dis-
crimination toward consumers of  mental health and substance use disorder services and to assist the
member in creating and maintaining recovery, health and wellness.
[(22)] (23) “Person centered care” means care that:
(a) Reflects the individual patient’s strengths and preferences;
(b) Reflects the clinical  needs of the patient as identified through an individualized assessment;
and
(c) Is based upon the patient’s goals and will assist the patient in achieving the goals.
[(23)] (24) “Personal health navigator” means an individual who  meets qualification criteria
adopted by the authority under ORS  414.665 and who provides information, assistance, tools and
support to enable a patient to make the best health care decisions in the patient’s particular  cir-
cumstances and in light of the patient’s needs, lifestyle, combination of conditions  and desired out-
comes.
[(24)] (25) “Prepaid managed care health services  organization” means a managed dental care,
mental health or chemical  dependency organization that contracts with the authority under ORS
414.654 or with a coordinated care organization on a  prepaid capitated basis to provide health ser-
vices to medical assistance recipients.
[(25)] (26) “Quality measure”  means the health outcome and quality measures and benchmarks
identified by the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee and  the metrics and scoring subcommittee
in accordance with ORS 413.017 (4) and 413.022 and the quality metrics  developed by the Behavioral
Health Committee in accordance with ORS 413.017 (5).
[(26)(a)] (27)(a) “Quality of life in general measure” means an assessment of the value, effec-
tiveness or cost-effectiveness of a treatment that gives  greater value to a year of life lived in perfect
health than the value given to a year of life lived in less than perfect health.
(b) “Quality of life in general measure” does  not mean an assessment of the value, effectiveness
or cost-effectiveness  of a treatment during a clinical trial in which a study participant is asked to
rate the participant’s physical function, pain, general health, vitality,  social functions or other sim-
ilar domains.
[(27)] (28) “Resources” has the meaning given that term in  ORS 411.704. For eligibility purposes,
“resources”  does  not include charitable contributions raised by a community to assist with medical
expenses.
[(28)] (29) “Social determinants of health” means:
(a) Nonmedical factors that influence health outcomes;
(b) The conditions in which individuals are born, grow, work, live and age; and
(c) The forces and  systems that shape the conditions of daily life, such as economic policies and
systems, development agendas, social norms, social policies, racism, climate change  and political
systems.
Enrolled Senate Bill 692 (SB 692-B) Page 5
[(29)] (30) “Tribal traditional health worker” means an individual who meets qualification cri-
teria adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who:
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in a tribal community or an urban Indian community, either for pay or as a  volunteer
in association with a local health care system;
(c) To the extent practicable, shares ethnicity, language, socioeconomic status and  life experi-
ences with the residents of the community the worker serves;
(d) Assists members of the community to improve their health, including  physical, behavioral
and oral health, and increases  the capacity of the community to meet the health care needs of its
residents and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides health education and information that is culturally appropriate to the individuals
being served;
(f) Assists community residents in receiving the care they need;
(g) May give peer counseling and guidance on health behaviors; and
(h) May provide direct services, such as tribal-based practices.
[(30)(a)] (31)(a) “Youth support specialist” means an individual who meets qualification criteria
adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who, based  on a similar life experience, provides
supportive services to an individual who:
(A) Is not older than 30 years of age; and
(B)(i) Is a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment; or
(ii) Is facing or has faced difficulties in accessing education, health and wellness  services due
to a mental health or behavioral health barrier.
(b) A “youth support specialist” may be a peer wellness specialist or a peer support specialist.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 414.025, as amended by section  2, chapter 628, Oregon Laws 2021, and section
6, chapter 18, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
414.025. As used in this chapter and ORS chapters 411 and  413, unless the context or a specially
applicable statutory definition requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Alternative payment methodology” means a payment other  than a fee-for-services pay-
ment, used by coordinated care organizations as compensation for the provision of integrated and
coordinated health care and services.
(b) “Alternative payment methodology” includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Shared savings arrangements;
(B) Bundled payments; and
(C) Payments based on episodes.
(2) “Behavioral health assessment” means an evaluation by  a behavioral health clinician, in
person or using telemedicine, to determine a patient’s need for immediate crisis stabilization.
(3) “Behavioral health clinician” means:
(a) A licensed psychiatrist;
(b) A licensed psychologist;
(c) A licensed nurse practitioner with a specialty in psychiatric mental health;
(d) A licensed clinical social worker;
(e) A licensed professional counselor or licensed marriage and family therapist;
(f) A certified clinical social work associate;
(g) An intern or resident who is working under  a board-approved supervisory contract in a
clinical mental health field; or
(h) Any other clinician  whose authorized scope of practice includes mental health diagnosis and
treatment.
(4) “Behavioral health crisis” means a disruption in an  individual’s mental or emotional stability
or functioning resulting in an urgent  need for immediate outpatient treatment in an emergency de-
partment or  admission to a hospital to prevent a serious deterioration in the individual’s mental or
physical health.
Enrolled Senate Bill 692 (SB 692-B) Page 6
(5) “Behavioral health home”  means a mental health disorder or substance use disorder treat-
ment organization, as defined by the Oregon Health  Authority by rule, that provides integrated
health care to individuals  whose primary diagnoses are mental health disorders or substance use
disorders.
(6) “Category  of aid” means assistance provided by the Oregon Supplemental Income Program,
aid granted under ORS 411.877 to  411.896 and 412.001 to 412.069 or federal Supplemental Security
Income payments.
(7) “Community health  worker” means an individual who meets qualification criteria adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who:
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in an urban or rural community, either for pay or as a volunteer in  association with
a local health care system;
(c) To the extent practicable, shares ethnicity, language, socioeconomic status and  life experi-
ences with the residents of the community the worker serves;
(d) Assists members of the community to improve their  health and increases the capacity of the
community to meet the health care needs of its residents and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides health education and information that is culturally appropriate to the individuals
being served;
(f) Assists community residents in receiving the care they need;
(g) May give peer counseling and guidance on health behaviors; and
(h) May provide direct services such as first aid or blood pressure screening.
(8) “Coordinated care organization” means an organization meeting criteria adopted by  the
Oregon Health Authority under ORS 414.572.
(9) “Doula” means a trained professional who  provides continuous physical, emotional
and informational support to an individual during pregnancy, labor  and delivery or the
postpartum period to help the individual achieve the healthiest and most  satisfying experi-
ence possible.
[(9)] (10) “Dually eligible for Medicare and Medicaid” means, with respect to  eligibility for en-
rollment in a coordinated care organization, that an individual  is eligible for health services funded
by Title XIX of the Social Security Act and is:
(a) Eligible for or enrolled in Part A of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act; or
(b) Enrolled in Part B of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act.
[(10)(a)] (11)(a) “Family  support specialist” means an individual who meets qualification criteria
adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who provides supportive services to and  has ex-
perience parenting a child who:
(A) Is a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment; or
(B) Is facing or has faced difficulties in accessing education, health  and wellness services due
to a mental health or behavioral health barrier.
(b) A “family support specialist” may be a peer wellness specialist or a peer support specialist.
[(11)] (12) “Global budget” means  a total amount established prospectively by the Oregon Health
Authority to be paid to a  coordinated care organization for the delivery of, management of, access
to and quality of the health care delivered to members of the coordinated care organization.
[(12)] (13) “Health insurance exchange” or  “exchange” means an American Health Benefit Ex-
change described in 42 U.S.C. 18031, 18032, 18033 and 18041.
[(13)] (14) “Health services” means at least so much of each of the following as are  funded by
the Legislative Assembly based upon the  prioritized list of health services compiled by the Health
Evidence Review Commission under ORS 414.690:
(a) Services required by federal law to be included in the state’s medical assistance program in
order for the program to qualify for federal funds;
(b) Services provided  by a physician as defined in ORS 677.010, a nurse practitioner licensed
under ORS 678.375, a behavioral health clinician or other licensed  practitioner within the scope of
the practitioner’s practice as defined by state law, and ambulance services;
Enrolled Senate Bill 692 (SB 692-B) Page 7
(c) Prescription drugs;
(d) Laboratory and X-ray services;
(e) Medical equipment and supplies;
(f) Mental health services;
(g) Chemical dependency services;
(h) Emergency dental services;
(i) Nonemergency dental services;
(j) Provider services, other than services described in paragraphs (a) to (i), (k), (L) and  (m) of
this subsection, defined by federal  law that may be included in the state’s medical assistance pro-
gram;
(k) Emergency hospital services;
(L) Outpatient hospital services; and
(m) Inpatient hospital services.
[(14)] (15) “Income” has the meaning given that term in ORS 411.704.
[(15)(a)] (16)(a) “Integrated health care” means care provided to  individuals and their families
in a patient centered primary care  home or behavioral health home by licensed primary care
clinicians, behavioral health clinicians and other care  team members, working together to address
one or more of the following:
(A) Mental illness.
(B) Substance use disorders.
(C) Health behaviors that contribute to chronic illness.
(D) Life stressors and crises.
(E) Developmental risks and conditions.
(F) Stress-related physical symptoms.
(G) Preventive care.
(H) Ineffective patterns of health care utilization.
(b) As used in this subsection, “other care team members” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Qualified mental health professionals or qualified mental  health associates meeting require-
ments adopted by the Oregon Health Authority by rule;
(B) Peer wellness specialists;
(C) Peer support specialists;
(D) Community health workers who have completed a state-certified training program;
(E) Personal health navigators; or
(F) Other qualified individuals approved by the Oregon Health Authority.
[(16)] (17) “Investments and savings” means cash, securities  as defined in ORS 59.015, negotiable
instruments as defined in ORS 73.0104 and such similar investments or savings as  the department
or the authority may establish by rule that are available to the  applicant or recipient to contribute
toward meeting the needs of the applicant or recipient.
[(17)] (18) “Medical assistance” means so  much of the medical, mental health, preventive, sup-
portive, palliative and remedial care and services as may be prescribed  by the authority according
to the standards established pursuant to ORS 414.065, including premium assistance under ORS
414.115 and  414.117, payments made for services provided under an insurance or other contractual
arrangement and money paid directly to the recipient for the purchase of health  services and for
services described in ORS 414.710.
[(18)] (19) “Medical assistance” includes any care or services for  any individual who is a patient
in a medical institution or any care or services for any individual  who has attained 65 years of age
or is under 22 years of age,  and who is a patient in a private or public institution for mental dis-
eases. Except  as  provided in ORS 411.439 and 411.447, “medical assistance” does not include care
or services for a resident of a nonmedical public institution.
[(19)] (20) “Mental health drug” means a type  of legend drug, as defined in ORS 414.325, speci-
fied by the Oregon Health Authority by rule, including but not limited to:
(a) Therapeutic class 7 ataractics-tranquilizers; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 692 (SB 692-B) Page 8
(b) Therapeutic class 11 psychostimulants-antidepressants.
[(20)] (21) “Patient centered primary  care home” means a health care team or clinic that is or-
ganized in  accordance with the standards established by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS
414.655 and that incorporates the following core attributes:
(a) Access to care;
(b) Accountability to consumers and to the community;
(c) Comprehensive whole person care;
(d) Continuity of care;
(e) Coordination and integration of care; and
(f) Person and family centered care.
[(21)] (22) “Peer support specialist” means any of the following individuals who meet  qualifica-
tion criteria adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who  provide supportive services to a
current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment:
(a) An individual who is a current or former consumer of mental health treatment; or
(b) An individual who is in recovery, as defined by the Oregon Health Authority by rule,  from
an addiction disorder.
[(22)] (23) “Peer wellness specialist” means an individual who meets  qualification criteria
adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665  and who is responsible for assessing mental health and
substance use disorder service and support needs of a member of a coordinated care  organization
through community outreach,  assisting members with access to available services and resources,
addressing barriers to services and providing education and information  about available resources
for individuals with mental health or substance use disorders in order  to reduce stigma and dis-
crimination toward consumers of  mental health and substance use disorder services and to assist the
member in creating and maintaining recovery, health and wellness.
[(23)] (24) “Person centered care” means care that:
(a) Reflects the individual patient’s strengths and preferences;
(b) Reflects the clinical  needs of the patient as identified through an individualized assessment;
and
(c) Is based upon the patient’s goals and will assist the patient in achieving the goals.
[(24)] (25) “Personal health navigator” means an individual who  meets qualification criteria
adopted by the authority under ORS  414.665 and who provides information, assistance, tools and
support to enable a patient to make the best health care decisions in the patient’s particular  cir-
cumstances and in light of the patient’s needs, lifestyle, combination of conditions  and desired out-
comes.
[(25)] (26) “Prepaid managed care health services  organization” means a managed dental care,
mental health or chemical  dependency organization that contracts with the authority under ORS
414.654 or with a coordinated care organization on a  prepaid capitated basis to provide health ser-
vices to medical assistance recipients.
[(26)] (27) “Quality measure”  means the health outcome and quality measures and benchmarks
identified by the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee and  the metrics and scoring subcommittee
in accordance with ORS 413.017 (4) and 413.022 and the quality metrics  developed by the Behavioral
Health Committee in accordance with ORS 413.017 (5).
[(27)(a)] (28)(a) “Quality of life in general measure” means an assessment of the value, effec-
tiveness or cost-effectiveness of a treatment that gives  greater value to a year of life lived in perfect
health than the value given to a year of life lived in less than perfect health.
(b) “Quality of life in general measure” does  not mean an assessment of the value, effectiveness
or cost-effectiveness  of a treatment during a clinical trial in which a study participant is asked to
rate the participant’s physical function, pain, general health, vitality,  social functions or other sim-
ilar domains.
[(28)] (29) “Resources” has the meaning given that term in  ORS 411.704. For eligibility purposes,
“resources”  does  not include charitable contributions raised by a community to assist with medical
expenses.
Enrolled Senate Bill 692 (SB 692-B) Page 9
[(29)] (30) “Social determinants of health” means:
(a) Nonmedical factors that influence health outcomes;
(b) The conditions in which individuals are born, grow, work, live and age; and
(c) The forces and  systems that shape the conditions of daily life, such as economic policies and
systems, development agendas,  social norms, social policies, racism, climate change and political
systems.
[(30)] (31) “Tribal traditional health worker” means an individual who meets qualification  cri-
teria adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who:
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in a tribal community or an urban Indian community, either for pay or as a  volunteer
in association with a local health care system;
(c) To the extent practicable, shares ethnicity, language, socioeconomic status and  life experi-
ences with the residents of the community the worker serves;
(d) Assists members of the community to improve their health, including  physical, behavioral
and oral health, and increases  the capacity of the community to meet the health care needs of its
residents and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides health education and information that is culturally appropriate to the individuals
being served;
(f) Assists community residents in receiving the care they need;
(g) May give peer counseling and guidance on health behaviors; and
(h) May provide direct services, such as tribal-based practices.
[(31)(a)] (32)(a) “Youth support specialist” means an individual who meets qualification criteria
adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who, based  on a similar life experience, provides
supportive services to an individual who:
(A) Is not older than 30 years of age; and
(B)(i) Is a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment; or
(ii) Is facing or has faced difficulties in accessing education, health and wellness  services due
to a mental health or behavioral health barrier.
(b) A “youth support specialist” may be a peer wellness specialist or a peer support specialist.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 414.665 is amended to read:
414.665. (1) As used in this section, “traditional health worker” includes any of the following:
(a) A community health worker.
(b) A personal health navigator.
(c) A peer wellness specialist.
(d) A peer support specialist.
(e) A doula.
(f) A tribal traditional health worker.
(2) In consultation with the Traditional Health Workers Commission established  under ORS
413.600, the Oregon Health Authority, for purposes  related to the regulation of traditional health
workers, shall adopt by rule:
(a) The qualification criteria, including education and training requirements,  for the traditional
health workers utilized by coordinated care organizations , including distinct qualification criteria
for birth doulas and postpartum doulas ;
(b) Appropriate professional designations for supervisors of the traditional health workers; and
(c) Processes by which other occupational classifications may be approved to supervise the tra-
ditional health workers.
(3) The criteria and requirements established under subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Must be broad enough to encompass  the potential unique needs of any coordinated care or-
ganization;
(b) Must meet requirements of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to  qualify for
federal financial participation; and
(c) May not require certification by the Home Care Commission.
Enrolled Senate Bill 692 (SB 692-B) Page 10
SECTION 6.  ORS 414.667 is amended to read:
414.667. As used in ORS 414.667[ , 414.668 and] to 414.669[,]:
(1) “Doula” [ means an individual who meets criteria for a doula adopted by the Oregon Health
Authority in accordance with ORS 414.665 ] has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025 .
(2) “Lactation counselor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 676.665.
(3) “Lactation educator” has the meaning given that term in ORS 676.665.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 414.668 is amended to read:
414.668. (1) In determining the types and extent of  health care and services to be provided
to medical assistance recipients under ORS 414.065,  the Oregon Health Authority and a co-
ordinated care organization shall ensure that recipients have  access to services provided by
doulas, lactation counselors and lactation educators.
(2) The services described in subsection (1) of this section must:
(a) Include a minimum of 24 hours of services, in  addition to labor and delivery services,
regardless of  birth outcome, with an option for the authority or a coordinated care organ-
ization to approve additional hours based on need;
(b) Be sufficient to support recipients’ robust maternal health  and support positive birth
outcomes; and
(c) Be provided:
(A) By an individual or organization from the community of  the recipient, using lan-
guage, structures and settings familiar to members of the community; or
(B) If an individual or organization from the community  of the recipient is not available,
by a provider that has received cultural  competency training within the preceding three
years.
(3) Access to doulas, lactation counselors and lactation educators:
(a) Must be made available without a referral from another health care provider; and
(b) May not require a signature from or supervision  by any other health care provider,
except as necessary to approve additional  hours based on need as described in subsection
(2)(a) of this section.
(4) A coordinated care organization shall make  information about how to access [ doula] services
provided by a doula, lactation counselor or lactation educator  available  on a website operated
by or on behalf of the coordinated care organization and  shall provide the information in print
whenever a printed explanation of benefits is available.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 414.669 is amended to read:
414.669. (1) The Oregon Health Authority, in coordination with the  Traditional Health Workers
Commission, shall in each even-numbered year review, and revise if necessary, any rates of  re-
imbursement in the state medical assistance program  for doulas. When reviewing  and revising
rates of reimbursement, the authority shall consider factors including  retention of doulas  and the
need to ensure that a career as a doula is  financially sustainable , access to culturally specific
doulas and evidence-based  factors and empirical studies related to the cost-effectiveness of services
provided by doulas.
(2) The authority shall in each even-numbered year review, and revise if necessary, any
rates of reimbursement in the state medical assistance program for lactation  counselors and
lactation educators. When  reviewing and revising rates of reimbursement, the authority
shall consider factors including retention of lactation counselors and lactation educators  and
the need to ensure that a career as a lactation counselor  or lactation educator is financially
sustainable, access to culturally  specific lactation counselors and lactation educators and
evidence-based factors and  empirical studies related to the cost-effectiveness of services
provided by lactation counselors and lactation educators.
SECTION 9. Section 10 of this 2025 Act is added to and made  a part of ORS 414.667 to
414.669.
SECTION 10. (1) No later than September 15 of each even-numbered year, the Oregon
Health Authority, in coordination with the Traditional  Health Workers Commission, shall
Enrolled Senate Bill 692 (SB 692-B) Page 11
report on the status of doulas in this state, in the manner provided in  ORS 192.245, to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health.
(2) The report described in  subsection (1) of this section must include information about:
(a) The number of claims for reimbursement of doulas submitted to  the authority and
the percentage of those claims that are reimbursed;
(b) Any barriers experienced by doulas to accessing the claims process;
(c) The annual increase or decrease in the number of doulas  listed on a registry managed
by the authority;
(d) The demographics of the registry of doulas managed by the authority;
(e) Doula training or certification programs offered in this state;
(f) The relationship between the registry of doulas managed by the authority and  the
perceived doula workforce need;
(g) Recommendations on achieving cultural specificity goals for doula services; and
(h) Disaggregated birth outcomes for patients with doula support  and without doula
support.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 413.600 is amended to read:
413.600. (1) There is established within the  Oregon Health Authority the Traditional Health
Workers Commission.
(2) The Director of the Oregon Health Authority shall appoint the following 24 members to serve
on the commission:
(a) Fourteen members, of which a majority must be appointed from nominees selected by the
Oregon  Community Health Workers Association, who represent traditional health workers, including
at least one member to represent each of the following:
(A) Community health workers, as defined in ORS 414.025;
(B) Personal health navigators, as defined in ORS 414.025;
(C) Peer wellness specialists, as defined in ORS 414.025;
(D) Peer support specialists, as defined in ORS 414.025;
(E) Doulas , as defined in ORS 414.025 ;
(F) Family support specialists, as defined in ORS 414.025;
(G) Youth support specialists, as defined in ORS 414.025; and
(H) Tribal traditional health workers, as defined in ORS 414.025;
(b) One member who represents the Office of Community Colleges and Workforce Development;
(c) One member who is a nurse who represents the Oregon Nurses Association;
(d) One member who is a physician licensed in this state;
(e) One member selected from nominees provided by the Home Care Commission;
(f) One member who represents coordinated care organizations;
(g) One member who represents a labor organization;
(h) One member who supervises traditional health workers at  a community-based organization,
local health department, as defined in ORS 433.235, or agency, as defined in ORS 183.310;
(i) One member who represents community-based organizations or agencies,  as defined in ORS
183.310, that provide for the training of traditional health workers;
(j) One member who represents a consumer of services provided  by health workers who are not
licensed by this state; and
(k) One member who represents providers of Indian health  services that work with traditional
health workers qualified under ORS 414.665, a federally recognized tribe or a tribal organization.
(3) In appointing members under subsection (2) of this section, the  director shall consider
whether the composition of the Traditional  Health Workers Commission represents the geographic,
ethnic, gender, racial, disability status,  gender identity, sexual orientation and economic diversity
of traditional health workers.
(4) The term of office of each member of the commission is three years, but a member serves
at the pleasure of the director. Before the  expiration of the term of a member, the director shall
appoint a successor whose term begins on January  1 next following. A member is eligible for re-
Enrolled Senate Bill 692 (SB 692-B) Page 12
appointment. If there is a  vacancy for any cause, the director shall make an appointment to become
immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(5) A majority of the members of the commission constitutes  a quorum for the transaction of
business.
(6) Official action by the commission requires the approval of a majority of the members  of the
commission.
(7) The commission shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) The commission  shall meet at times and places specified by the call of the chairperson or
of a majority of the members of the commission.
(9) The commission may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the commission.
(10) A member of the commission is entitled to  compensation and expenses as provided in ORS
292.495.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 676.665 is amended to read:
676.665. As used in ORS 676.665 to 676.689:
(1) “Lactation consultant” means a person licensed to practice lactation consultation.
(2) “Lactation consultation” means the clinical application  of scientific principles and evidence
to provide care related to lactation to childbearing families. Lactation  consultation includes, but is
not limited to:
(a) Client assessment through systematic collection of data;
(b) Data analysis;
(c) Creation of a care plan;
(d) Implementation of the care  plan, including demonstration and instructions to clients and
communication with the clients’ primary care provider;
(e) Evaluation of client outcomes;
(f) Problem identification and treatment;
(g) Recommendation and use of assistive devices; and
(h) Lactation education to childbearing families and to health care providers.
(3) “Lactation counselor” means a person certified by the Academy of Lactation  Policy
and Practice, or its successor organization, as approved by the  Health Licensing Office by
rule, as a clinical lactation  care provider who has demonstrated the necessary skills, know-
ledge and attitude to provide clinical support to families that are thinking, or have questions,
about breastfeeding or that have problems with breastfeeding.
(4) “Lactation educator” means a person  certified by the Childbirth and Postpartum
Professional Association, or its successor organization, as approved by the office by rule,  as
a certified lactation educator to educate,  counsel and support families by providing
evidence-based information about lactation and breastfeeding.
SECTION 13.
Section 14 of this 2025 Act is added to  and made a part of ORS 676.665 to
676.689.
SECTION 14. The Health Licensing Office shall adopt rules to regulate the practice of
lactation counselors and lactation educators. The rules must include at least rules to:
(1) Establish continuing education requirements for lactation counselors  and lactation
educators;
(2) Establish standards of practice for lactation counselors and lactation educators;
(3) Establish an authorization for lactation counselors and lactation educators;
(4) Prohibit the  unauthorized practice as a lactation counselor or lactation educator, and
prohibit the unauthorized use of the title “lactation counselor” or “lactation educator”; and
(5) Specify that  a lactation counselor or lactation educator may provide services to a
client who was pregnant regardless of the client’s birth outcome.
SECTION 15.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Doula” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(b) “Lactation counselor” and “lactation educator” have the  meanings given those terms
in ORS 676.665.
Enrolled Senate Bill 692 (SB 692-B) Page 13
(2) To the extent practicable, a doula, lactation counselor or lactation educator  shall
strive to provide services that are culturally specific, as  defined in ORS 413.256, to a client
or patient.
SECTION 16. Section 17  of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of the Insurance
Code.
SECTION 17. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Doula” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.667.
(b) “Lactation counselor” and “lactation educator” have the  meanings given those terms
in ORS 676.665.
(2) A  health benefit plan, as defined in ORS 743B.005, in this state that reimburses the
cost of pregnancy and childbirth expenses shall provide coverage for services provided by
doulas, lactation counselors and lactation educators.
(3) Covered services required under subsection (2) of this section shall include a  mini-
mum of 24 hours of services, in addition to labor and delivery services, regardless of birth
outcome, with an  option for the health benefit plan to approve additional hours based on
need.
(4) Except for  coverage of additional hours based on need as described in subsection (3)
of this section, the health benefit plan described in subsection (2) of this section may not
require prior authorization, a referral from another health care  provider or a signature from
or supervision by  any other health care provider for coverage of services described in this
section.
(5) A health benefit plan that  provides the services described in subsection (2) of this
section shall provide information on how to access doulas, lactation counselors and lactation
educators to all enrollees.
(6) The coverage required  by subsection (2) of this section may be made subject to pro-
visions of the policy, certificate or contract that apply to other benefits  under the policy,
certificate or contract, including, but not limited  to, provisions related to deductibles and
coinsurance.
(7) The health benefit plan shall reimburse the cost for coverage  of services described in
this section  up to a total amount that is not less than $3,760. On January 1 of each year, the
Department of Consumer and Business Services  shall adjust the dollar limit provided by this
subsection to reflect the percentage changes in the Consumer  Price Index for all Urban
Consumers, West Region (All Items), as  published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the
United States Department of Labor or a successor agency, and may vary from year to  year.
(8) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 750.055, as amended by section 3, chapter 24,  Oregon Laws 2024, section 4,
chapter 35, Oregon Laws 2024, section 21, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, and  section 162, chapter
73, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
750.055. (1) The following provisions apply  to health care service contractors to the extent not
inconsistent with the express provisions of ORS 750.005 to 750.095:
(a) ORS 705.137, 705.138 and 705.139.
(b) ORS 731.004 to 731.150, 731.162, 731.216 to 731.362,  731.382, 731.385, 731.386, 731.390, 731.398
to 731.430, 731.428, 731.450, 731.454, 731.485, as provided in subsection (2)  of this section, ORS
731.488, 731.504, 731.508, 731.509, 731.510, 731.511, 731.512, 731.574 to 731.620, 731.640 to  731.652,
731.730, 731.731, 731.735, 731.737, 731.750, 731.752, 731.804, 731.808 and 731.844 to 731.992.
(c) ORS 732.215, 732.220, 732.230,  732.245, 732.250, 732.320, 732.325 and 732.517 to 732.596, not
including ORS 732.582, and ORS 732.650 to 732.689.
(d) ORS 733.010 to 733.050, 733.080, 733.140 to 733.170, 733.210, 733.510 to 733.680 and  733.695
to 733.780.
(e) ORS 734.014 to 734.440.
(f) ORS 742.001 to 742.009, 742.013, 742.016, 742.061, 742.065, 742.150 to 742.162 and 742.518 to
742.542.
Enrolled Senate Bill 692 (SB 692-B) Page 14
(g) ORS 743.004, 743.005, 743.007, 743.008, 743.010, 743.018, 743.020, 743.022, 743.023, 743.025,
743.028, 743.029, 743.038, 743.040, 743.044, 743.050, 743.100  to 743.109, 743.402, 743.405, 743.406,
743.417, 743.472, 743.492, 743.495, 743.498, 743.522, 743.523, 743.524, 743.526, 743.535, 743.550, 743.650
to 743.656, 743.680 to 743.689, 743.788 and 743.790.
(h) ORS 743A.010, 743A.012, 743A.014,  743A.020, 743A.034, 743A.036, 743A.040, 743A.044,
743A.048, 743A.051, 743A.052, 743A.058, 743A.060, 743A.062, 743A.063, 743A.064,  743A.065, 743A.066,
743A.068, 743A.070, 743A.080, 743A.082, 743A.084, 743A.088, 743A.090, 743A.100, 743A.104, 743A.105,
743A.108, 743A.110, 743A.124, 743A.140, 743A.141, 743A.148, 743A.150, 743A.160,  743A.168, 743A.169,
743A.170, 743A.175,  743A.185, 743A.188, 743A.190, 743A.192, 743A.250, 743A.252, 743A.260, 743A.310
and 743A.315 and section 2, chapter 771, Oregon Laws 2013, and section 2, chapter  70, Oregon Laws
2024, and section 17 of this 2025 Act .
(i) ORS 743B.001, 743B.003 to 743B.127, 743B.128, 743B.130, 743B.195,  743B.197, 743B.200,
743B.202, 743B.204, 743B.220, 743B.221, 743B.222,  743B.225, 743B.227, 743B.250, 743B.252, 743B.253,
743B.254, 743B.255, 743B.256, 743B.257, 743B.258, 743B.280 to 743B.285, 743B.287, 743B.300, 743B.310,
743B.320, 743B.323, 743B.330, 743B.340, 743B.341, 743B.342, 743B.343 to 743B.347, 743B.400, 743B.403,
743B.407, 743B.420, 743B.423, 743B.450, 743B.451, 743B.452,  743B.453, 743B.470, 743B.475, 743B.505,
743B.550, 743B.555, 743B.601, 743B.602 and 743B.800 and section 2,  chapter 24, Oregon Laws 2024,
and section 2, chapter 35, Oregon Laws 2024.
(j) The following provisions of ORS chapter 744:
(A) ORS 744.052 to 744.089, 744.091 and 744.093, relating to the regulation  of insurance produc-
ers;
(B) ORS 744.602 to 744.665, relating to the regulation of insurance consultants; and
(C) ORS 744.700 to 744.740, relating to the regulation of third party administrators.
(k) ORS 746.005 to 746.140, 746.160, 746.220 to 746.370, 746.600, 746.605, 746.607, 746.608,  746.610,
746.615, 746.625, 746.635, 746.650, 746.655, 746.660, 746.668, 746.670, 746.675, 746.680 and 746.690.
(2) The following provisions of the  Insurance Code apply to health care service contractors ex-
cept in the case of group practice health maintenance  organizations that are federally qualified
pursuant to Title XIII of the Public Health Service Act:
(a) ORS 731.485, if the group practice health maintenance organization  wholly owns and oper-
ates an in-house drug outlet.
(b) ORS 743A.024, unless the patient is referred by a physician, physician associate  or nurse
practitioner associated with a group practice health maintenance organization.
(3) For the purposes of this section, health care service contractors are insurers.
(4) Any for-profit health care service contractor organized under the laws of any other state that
is not governed by the insurance laws  of the other state is subject to all requirements of ORS
chapter 732.
(5)(a) A health  care service contractor is a domestic insurance company for the purpose of de-
termining whether the health care service contractor is a debtor, as defined in 11 U.S.C. 109.
(b) A health care service contractor’s  classification as a domestic insurance company under
paragraph (a) of this subsection does not subject the health care service contractor to ORS  734.510
to 734.710.
(6) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services  may, after notice and
hearing, adopt reasonable rules not inconsistent with this section and ORS  750.003, 750.005, 750.025
and 750.045 that are necessary for the proper administration of these provisions.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 750.055, as amended by section 21, chapter 771,  Oregon Laws 2013, section
7, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2014, section 82, chapter 45, Oregon Laws 2014, section  9, chapter 59,
Oregon Laws 2015, section 7, chapter 100, Oregon Laws  2015, section 7, chapter 224, Oregon Laws
2015, section 11, chapter 362, Oregon Laws 2015, section 10, chapter 470, Oregon Laws  2015, section
30, chapter 515, Oregon Laws 2015, section  10, chapter 206, Oregon Laws 2017, section 6, chapter
417, Oregon Laws 2017, section 22, chapter 479, Oregon Laws 2017, section 10, chapter  7, Oregon
Laws 2018, section 69, chapter  13, Oregon Laws 2019, section 38, chapter 151, Oregon Laws 2019,
section 5, chapter  441, Oregon Laws 2019, section 85, chapter 97, Oregon Laws 2021, section 12,
Enrolled Senate Bill 692 (SB 692-B) Page 15
chapter 37, Oregon Laws 2022, section  5, chapter 111, Oregon Laws 2023, section 2, chapter 152,
Oregon Laws 2023, section 4, chapter 24, Oregon Laws 2024, section  5, chapter 35, Oregon Laws
2024, section 22, chapter  70, Oregon Laws 2024, and section 163, chapter 73, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
750.055. (1) The following provisions apply to health care service  contractors to the extent not
inconsistent with the express provisions of ORS 750.005 to 750.095:
(a) ORS 705.137, 705.138 and 705.139.
(b) ORS 731.004 to 731.150, 731.162, 731.216 to 731.362,  731.382, 731.385, 731.386, 731.390, 731.398
to 731.430, 731.428, 731.450, 731.454,  731.485, as provided in subsection (2) of this section, ORS
731.488, 731.504,  731.508, 731.509, 731.510, 731.511, 731.512, 731.574 to 731.620, 731.640 to 731.652,
731.730, 731.731, 731.735, 731.737, 731.750, 731.752, 731.804, 731.808 and 731.844 to 731.992.
(c) ORS 732.215, 732.220, 732.230, 732.245, 732.250, 732.320, 732.325 and  732.517 to 732.596, not
including ORS 732.582, and ORS 732.650 to 732.689.
(d) ORS  733.010 to 733.050, 733.080, 733.140 to 733.170, 733.210, 733.510 to 733.680 and 733.695
to 733.780.
(e) ORS 734.014 to 734.440.
(f) ORS 742.001 to 742.009, 742.013, 742.016, 742.061, 742.065, 742.150 to 742.162 and 742.518 to
742.542.
(g) ORS 743.004, 743.005, 743.007, 743.008, 743.010, 743.018, 743.020, 743.022, 743.023, 743.025,
743.028, 743.029, 743.038, 743.040, 743.044, 743.050,  743.100 to 743.109, 743.402, 743.405, 743.406,
743.417, 743.472, 743.492, 743.495, 743.498, 743.522, 743.523, 743.524, 743.526, 743.535, 743.550, 743.650
to 743.656, 743.680 to 743.689, 743.788 and 743.790.
(h) ORS 743A.010, 743A.012, 743A.014,  743A.020, 743A.034, 743A.036, 743A.040, 743A.044,
743A.048, 743A.051, 743A.052, 743A.058, 743A.060, 743A.062, 743A.063, 743A.064,  743A.065, 743A.066,
743A.068, 743A.070, 743A.080, 743A.082, 743A.084, 743A.088, 743A.090, 743A.100, 743A.104, 743A.105,
743A.108, 743A.110, 743A.124, 743A.140, 743A.141, 743A.148, 743A.150, 743A.160,  743A.168, 743A.169,
743A.170, 743A.175,  743A.185, 743A.188, 743A.190, 743A.192, 743A.250, 743A.252, 743A.260, 743A.310
and 743A.315 and section 2, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024 , and section 17 of this 2025 Act .
(i) ORS 743B.001, 743B.003 to 743B.127, 743B.128, 743B.130, 743B.195,  743B.197, 743B.200,
743B.202, 743B.204, 743B.220, 743B.221, 743B.222,  743B.225, 743B.227, 743B.250, 743B.252, 743B.253,
743B.254, 743B.255, 743B.256, 743B.257, 743B.258, 743B.280 to 743B.285, 743B.287, 743B.300, 743B.310,
743B.320, 743B.323, 743B.330, 743B.340, 743B.341, 743B.342, 743B.343 to 743B.347, 743B.400, 743B.403,
743B.407, 743B.420, 743B.423, 743B.450, 743B.451, 743B.452,  743B.453, 743B.470, 743B.475, 743B.505,
743B.550, 743B.555, 743B.601, 743B.602 and 743B.800 and section 2,  chapter 24, Oregon Laws 2024,
and section 2, chapter 35, Oregon Laws 2024.
(j) The following provisions of ORS chapter 744:
(A) ORS 744.052 to 744.089, 744.091 and 744.093, relating to the regulation  of insurance produc-
ers;
(B) ORS 744.602 to 744.665, relating to the regulation of insurance consultants; and
(C) ORS 744.700 to 744.740, relating to the regulation of third party administrators.
(k) ORS 746.005 to 746.140, 746.160, 746.220 to 746.370, 746.600, 746.605, 746.607, 746.608,  746.610,
746.615, 746.625, 746.635, 746.650, 746.655, 746.660, 746.668, 746.670, 746.675, 746.680 and 746.690.
(2) The following provisions of the  Insurance Code apply to health care service contractors ex-
cept in the case of group practice health maintenance  organizations that are federally qualified
pursuant to Title XIII of the Public Health Service Act:
(a) ORS 731.485, if the group practice health maintenance organization  wholly owns and oper-
ates an in-house drug outlet.
(b) ORS 743A.024, unless the patient is referred by a physician, physician associate  or nurse
practitioner associated with a group practice health maintenance organization.
(3) For the purposes of this section, health care service contractors are insurers.
Enrolled Senate Bill 692 (SB 692-B) Page 16
(4) Any for-profit health care service contractor organized under the laws of any other state that
is not governed by the insurance laws  of the other state is subject to all requirements of ORS
chapter 732.
(5)(a) A health care service contractor is a domestic insurance company for the purpose  of de-
termining whether the health care service contractor is a debtor, as defined in 11 U.S.C. 109.
(b) A health care service contractor’s classification as  a domestic insurance company under
paragraph (a) of this subsection does not subject the health care service contractor to ORS  734.510
to 734.710.
(6) The Director of the  Department of Consumer and Business Services may, after notice and
hearing, adopt reasonable rules not inconsistent with this section and ORS  750.003, 750.005, 750.025
and 750.045 that are necessary for the proper administration of these provisions.
SECTION 20. ORS 750.333, as amended by section  5, chapter 24, Oregon Laws 2024, and section
23, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
750.333. (1) The following provisions apply to trusts carrying  out a multiple employer welfare
arrangement:
(a) ORS 705.137, 705.138 and 705.139.
(b) ORS 731.004 to 731.150, 731.162, 731.216 to 731.268, 731.296 to 731.316, 731.324, 731.328,
731.378, 731.386, 731.390, 731.398, 731.406, 731.410,  731.414, 731.418 to 731.434, 731.454, 731.484,
731.486, 731.488, 731.512, 731.574 to 731.620,  731.640 to 731.652, 731.804, 731.808 and 731.844 to
731.992.
(c) ORS 733.010 to  733.050, 733.140 to 733.170, 733.210, 733.510 to 733.680 and 733.695 to 733.780.
(d) ORS 734.014 to 734.440.
(e) ORS 742.001 to 742.009, 742.013, 742.016, 742.061 and 742.065.
(f) ORS 743.004, 743.005, 743.007,  743.008, 743.010, 743.018, 743.020, 743.023, 743.028, 743.029,
743.053, 743.405, 743.406, 743.524, 743.526, 743.535 and 743B.221.
(g) ORS 743A.010, 743A.012, 743A.014, 743A.020,  743A.024, 743A.034, 743A.036, 743A.040,
743A.048, 743A.051, 743A.052, 743A.058, 743A.060, 743A.062, 743A.063, 743A.064,  743A.065, 743A.066,
743A.068, 743A.070, 743A.080, 743A.082, 743A.084, 743A.088, 743A.090, 743A.100, 743A.104, 743A.105,
743A.108, 743A.110, 743A.124, 743A.140, 743A.141, 743A.148, 743A.150, 743A.160,  743A.168, 743A.169,
743A.170, 743A.175,  743A.180, 743A.185, 743A.188, 743A.190, 743A.192, 743A.250, 743A.252, 743A.260
and 743A.310 and section 2, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024 , and section 17 of this 2025 Act .
(h) ORS 743B.001, 743B.003 to 743B.127 (except 743B.125 to 743B.127), 743B.195, 743B.197,
743B.200, 743B.202, 743B.204, 743B.220, 743B.222,  743B.225, 743B.227, 743B.250, 743B.252, 743B.253,
743B.254, 743B.255, 743B.256, 743B.257, 743B.258, 743B.310,  743B.320, 743B.321, 743B.330, 743B.340,
743B.341, 743B.342, 743B.343, 743B.344, 743B.345,  743B.347, 743B.400, 743B.403, 743B.407, 743B.420,
743B.423, 743B.451, 743B.453, 743B.470, 743B.505, 743B.550, 743B.555  and 743B.601 and section 2,
chapter 24, Oregon Laws 2024.
(i) The following provisions of ORS chapter 744:
(A) ORS 744.052 to  744.089, 744.091 and 744.093, relating to the regulation of insurance produc-
ers;
(B) ORS 744.602 to 744.665, relating to the regulation of insurance consultants; and
(C) ORS 744.700 to 744.740, relating to the regulation of third party administrators.
(j) ORS 746.005 to 746.140, 746.160 and 746.220 to 746.370.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) A trust carrying out a multiple employer welfare arrangement is an insurer.
(b) References to certificates of authority are references to certificates of multiple employer
welfare arrangement.
(c) Contributions are premiums.
(3) The  provision of health benefits under ORS 750.301 to 750.341 is the transaction of health
insurance.
(4) The Department of Consumer and Business Services may adopt rules that  are necessary to
implement the provisions of ORS 750.301 to 750.341.
Enrolled Senate Bill 692 (SB 692-B) Page 17
SECTION 21. The Department of Consumer and  Business Services shall issue guidance
on the implementation of section 17 of this 2025 Act, including alignment with the rules and
requirements for doulas, lactation counselors and lactation educators as described by  the
Oregon Health Authority.
SECTION 22.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Health  Authority, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, for deposit in the
Community-Based Perinatal Services Access Fund established in section 2  of this 2025 Act,
for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 23. (1) The amendments to ORS 414.668 and 414.669  by sections 7 and 8 of this
2025 Act apply to contracts between coordinated care organizations and the  Oregon Health
Authority entered into, amended or renewed on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(2) Section 17 of this 2025  Act and the amendments to ORS 750.055 and 750.333 by sections
18 to 20 of this 2025 Act apply to health benefit plans, health  care service contracts and
multiple employer welfare arrangements issued, renewed or  extended on or after the effec-
tive date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 24. Section 21 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 25. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health  Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (En-
rolled House Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  for Medicaid, is increased by
$1,851,146 for carrying out the provisions of sections 1, 10, 14  and 17 of this 2025 Act and the
amendments to ORS 414.668 and 414.669 by sections 7 and 8 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 26. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5025), collected or received by  the Oregon Health Authority, for
Medicaid, is increased by $2,072,116 for carrying out the provisions  of sections 1, 10, 14 and
17 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 414.668  and 414.669 by sections 7 and 8 of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 27.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (6), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2025 (En-
rolled House Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, for central services, is in-
creased by $360,099 for carrying out  the provisions of sections 1, 10, 14 and 17 of this 2025
Act and the amendments to ORS 414.668 and 414.669 by sections 7 and 8 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 28. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (8), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled  House Bill
5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds
received from  charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section
2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill  5025), collected or received by the
Oregon Health Authority, for central services, is  increased by $31,510 for carrying out the
provisions of sections 1, 10, 14 and 17 of this 2025 Act  and the amendments to ORS 414.668
and 414.669 by sections 7 and 8 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 29. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled  House Bill
5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5025), collected  or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for
central services, is increased  by $58,517 for carrying out the provisions of sections 1, 10, 14
and 17 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 414.668 and 414.669 by sections 7 and  8
of this 2025 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 692 (SB 692-B) Page 18
SECTION 30. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (4), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2025 (En-
rolled House Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2025, for public health, is increased
by $407,812 for carrying  out the provisions of sections 1, 10, 14 and 17 of this 2025 Act and
the amendments to ORS 414.668 and 414.669 by sections 7 and 8 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 31. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal  funds
received from  charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section
2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled  House Bill 5025), collected or received by the
Oregon Health Authority, for public health, is increased by $140,965 for carrying out  the
provisions of sections 1, 10, 14 and  17 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 414.668
and 414.669 by sections 7 and 8 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 32. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Health Authority for carrying  out the provisions of
section 1 of this 2025 Act, from the Community-Based Perinatal Services Access Fund es-
tablished in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 33.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (3), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2025 (En-
rolled House Bill 5025), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for health policy and ana-
lytics, is increased by $158,308 for carrying out the provisions of sections 1,  10, 14 and 17 of
this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 414.668 and 414.669 by sections 7 and 8 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 34. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled  House Bill
5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5025), collected  or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for
health policy and analytics, is increased by $27,940 for carrying out the  provisions of sections
1, 10, 14 and 17 of this 2025  Act and the amendments to ORS 414.668 and 414.669 by sections
7 and 8 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 35.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health  Authority by section 1 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (En-
rolled House Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, for state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $23,312 for  carrying out the provisions of sections 1,
10, 14 and 17 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 414.668 and 414.669 by sections  7
and 8 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 36. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (9), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled  House Bill
5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds
received from  charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section
2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill  5025), collected or received by the
Oregon Health Authority,  for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by
$2,393 for carrying out the provisions of sections 1, 10, 14 and 17 of this  2025 Act and the
amendments to ORS 414.668 and 414.669 by sections 7 and 8 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 37. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled  House Bill
5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
Enrolled Senate Bill 692 (SB 692-B) Page 19
2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5025), collected  or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for
state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $13,330 for carrying out  the
provisions of sections 1, 10, 14 and  17 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 414.668
and 414.669 by sections 7 and 8 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 38. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of  Human Services by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5526), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for state assessments
and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $33,627.
SECTION 39.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5526), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys  or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts
and including federal funds for indirect  cost recovery, Social Security Supplemental Security
Income recoveries and the Child Care and  Development Fund, but excluding lottery funds
and federal funds not described in section  2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5526), collected or received by the Department of Human Services, for state assessments
and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $1,252.
SECTION 40.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5526), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5526), collected or  received by the Department of Human Services,
for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $31,034.
SECTION 41.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (8), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5526), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys  or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts
and including federal funds for indirect  cost recovery, Social Security Supplemental Security
Income recoveries and the Child Care and  Development Fund, but excluding lottery funds
and federal funds not described in section  2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5526), collected or received by the Department  of Human Services, for shared services,
is increased by $94,870.
Enrolled Senate Bill 692 (SB 692-B) Page 20
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 692 (SB 692-B) Page 21